Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 5

Qualifications and Registration — Architects

62-2-501. General provisions.

In addition to the successful completion of examination acceptable to the board, the following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that an applicant is qualified for registration as an architect:

An applicant who is a graduate of a school of architecture where the professional degree curriculum has been accredited and who has completed three (3) years of practical experience in architectural work satisfactory to the board, of which not more than (1) year of architectural practical training and school may be concurrent; or

An applicant who is a graduate of a nonaccredited architectural curriculum, of not less than four (4) years in a curriculum approved by the board, and five (5) years of practical experience in architectural practical training satisfactory to the board, of which not more than one (1) year of architectural work and school may be concurrent;

An applicant who is a graduate of an architecture-related curriculum, of not less than four (4) years in a curriculum approved by the board, and seven (7) years of practical experience in architectural practical training satisfactory to the board, of which not more than one (1) year of architectural work and school may be concurrent.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 15; 1980, ch. 627, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-215; Acts 1983, ch. 71, §§ 2, 3; 1988, ch. 546, § 1.

Cross-References. Architecture examinations, § 62-2-504.

Occupation tax on architects, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Qualification and registration generally, title 62, chapter 2, part 3.

62-2-502. Degree accreditation of architecture schools.

An accredited degree in architecture shall be one that was accredited by the National Architectural Accrediting Board (N.A.A.B.) at the time of graduation, or graduation was not more than two (2) academic years prior to accreditation. For the purposes of this chapter, a state-supported school of architecture approved by the Tennessee higher education commission is deemed to have an accredited degree curriculum.

Approval of a curriculum that is not accredited under the terms of subsection (a) shall be at the discretion of the board and upon the basis of certified information submitted by the school for the full period attended by the applicant.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 16; T.C.A., § 62-216; Acts 1983, ch. 71, §§ 4, 5.

62-2-503. Practical architecture experience credit.

For the purpose of evaluating “practical experience in architectural work,” the board may utilize criteria and standards published by the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards (N.C.A.R.B.).

Every applicant shall have not less than two (2) years of practical experience in an office of a practicing registered architect.

To receive credit for practical training time, the applicant must be employed by the same employer for a period of not less than four (4) consecutive calendar months. The work month is considered to be one hundred forty (140) hours.

Experience acquired while employed by a registered architect practicing as an individual will be credited as practical training only when acquired under the supervision of the practicing architect in the course of the regular practice. Practice as a principal after proper architectural registration by other jurisdictions may be accepted by the board as fulfilling the required experience in the office of a registered practicing architect.

Experience acquired while employed by a partnership or corporation engaging in the practice of architecture will be credited as practical training only when acquired under the supervision of the partner or partners or the officer or officers who shall be the registered architect or registered architects exercising professional and supervisory control over the particular architectural services rendered by the partnership or corporation.

Practical experience as approved by the board and obtained, while working in the United States government, public or private service agencies, covering the fields of education, research and in the service of such agencies as redevelopment authorities, Peace Corps, VISTA, HUD, other United States government and armed forces agencies, multiplied by a factor of .75, may be considered as “practical experience in architectural work.”

Notwithstanding any provision in this section, the board may refuse to credit as practical training experience acquired while employed by an individual or by any type of organization having any interest in any project or building prejudicial to or in conflict with the individual's or organization's professional interest therein.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 17; T.C.A., § 62-217; Acts 1983, ch. 71, § 6.

62-2-504. Examinations — Fees.

The written examination for candidates who are eligible for registration under § 62-2-501 may be the current architect registration examination prepared by the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards (N.C.A.R.B.), as accepted by the board.

The board shall be responsible for administering and grading the examinations.

Candidates will retain credit for any parts of the examination passed and may, at the board's discretion, be permitted to have unlimited retakes of any parts of the examination failed.

The deadline date for receipt of applications for examination shall be at the discretion of the board. Each applicant eligible for written examination shall be notified of the dates set for each part of the examination, where it shall be held and the instruments and materials the applicant shall provide.

The initial application fee shall entitle the candidate to one (1) examination of a prescribed number of parts. An additional fee shall be required for the retaking and examination or parts thereof. No refunds will be made.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 18; 1980, ch. 627, §§ 2, 3, 8-10; T.C.A., § 62-218; Acts 1983, ch. 71, § 7.

62-2-505. Commencing examinations in other states.

Upon proper application, the board may administer any part of the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards' examinations for candidates who have commenced the series of examinations in another state. Each such application shall be accompanied by an administration fee and endorsement by the architectural registration board of original application. Separate applications shall be filed for each year's examination.

Upon proper application, the board may, at its discretion, credit to a candidate any of the prescribed parts of the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards' examinations successfully passed and properly attested to by another state or possession. The candidate may then take the remaining examination parts as set forth in this section, and, if successfully completed under its jurisdiction, may be registered by the board. The board will extend such transfer privileges only once to each applicant and may, at its discretion, accept transfer of grades only from the state of original application.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 19; T.C.A., § 62-219.

62-2-506. Finishing examinations in other states.

When requested to do so, the board may allow candidates who have commenced examinations in Tennessee as outlined under § 62-2-504(a), to finish taking parts of these examinations in any other state; provided, that the other state approved this procedure and has established a method of accomplishing it.

The board may, at its discretion and upon proper application, forward the grades achieved by a candidate in the various sections of the examination given under its jurisdiction to other duly constituted architectural registration boards for their use in evaluating and utilizing the results in registering the individual within their jurisdiction. The request for transfer shall include a statement of concurrence by the other board and a description of the information it will require. The candidate shall state the candidate's need for requesting a transfer and pay a fee established by the board. The transfer shall terminate the candidate's current application to this board for registration.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 20; T.C.A., § 62-220; Acts 1983, ch. 71, § 8.

62-2-507. Recording and transferring examination results.

Whether conducted in this state or another state, all records of the examinations shall be returned to the state board of registration of architects where the series of examinations were commenced for recording and licensure when successfully completed.

After the written examination marks are properly recorded in the permanent record book, all examination books and papers over two (2) years old may be destroyed.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 21; T.C.A., § 62-221.

62-2-508. Exemption from continuing education requirements for certain architects.

Any continuing education requirements established pursuant to this chapter shall provide that architects who were born prior to January 1, 1928, shall be exempt from complying with continuing education standards and requirements.

Acts 2004, ch. 529, § 1.